Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.130

Order of court—Civil nature—Modification of penalty—Community restitution.

(1) An order entered after the receipt of a response which does not contest the determination, or after it has been established at a hearing that the civil infraction was committed, or after a hearing for the purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances is civil in nature.

(2) The court may waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty prescribed for the civil infraction. If the court determines that a person has insufficient funds to pay the monetary penalty, the court may order performance of a number of hours of community restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty, at the rate of the then state minimum wage per hour.

[ 2002 c 175 s 1; 1987 c 456 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 175: "This act takes effect July 1, 2002." [ 2002 c 175 s 53.]